exercise6/Assignment_6_2_finnish_vowel_harmony.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
        +Nom +Gen +Ade +Abl +All +Ine +Ela +Tra +Ess
        +kin +kAAn +kO +hAn
        ! TO DO: Add more multicharacter symbols as needed

LEXICON Root
Nouns "weight: 0.3" ;
! TO DO: Add your compound-words lexicons here

LEXICON Nouns
kissa:kissa   Next "weight: 0.0002" ;
koira:koira   Next "weight: 0.0002" ;
melu:melu     Next "weight: 0.00001" ;
metsä:metsä   Next "weight: 0.0001" ;
peli:peli    Next "weight: 0.0001" ;
päivä:päivä   Next "weight: 0.0002" ;
pää:pää     Next "weight: 0.0002" ;
sähkö:sähkö   Next "weight: 0.00001" ;
talo:talo    Next "weight: 0.0001" ;
tie:tie     Next "weight: 0.0002" ;
tuoli:tuoli   Next "weight: 0.0001" ;
työ:työ     Next "weight: 0.0002" ;
väri:väri    Next "weight: 0.0001" ;
yö:yö      Next "weight: 0.0002" ;

LEXICON Next
0:%^    Nouns "weight: 0.6" ;     
        Case "weight: 0.05" ; 

LEXICON Case
+Nom:0          kinkAAn "weight: 0.05" ;
+Gen:n          kinkAAn "weight: 0.03" ;
+Ade:llA        kinkAAn "weight: 0.02" ;
+Abl:ltA        kinkAAn "weight: 0.03" ;
+All:lle        kinkAAn "weight: 0.035" ;
+Ine:ssA        kinkAAn "weight: 0.04" ;
+Ela:stA        kinkAAn "weight: 0.02" ;
+Tra:ksi        kinkAAn "weight: 0.02" ;
+Ess:nA         kinkAAn "weight: 0.01" ;

LEXICON kinkAAn
+kin:kin        kO "weight: 0.05" ;
+kAAn:kAAn      kO "weight: 0.03" ;
                kO "weight: 0.003" ; ! continue without any suffix

LEXICON kO
+kO:kO          hAn "weight: 0.05" ;
                hAn "weight: 0.003" ; ! continue without any suffix
! TO DO: Add the -han/-hän lexicon somewhere

LEXICON hAn
+hAn:hAn        # "weight: 0.05" ;
                # "weight: 0.003" ; ! continue without any suffix
                
END
